Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2325YC (4) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 260C.14, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. Determine the curriculum to be offered in such 3 school or college subject to approval of the director and 4 ensure that all career and technical education offerings are 5 competency-based, provide any minimum competencies required 6 by the department of education, comply with any applicable 7 requirements in chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 2 , and are 8 articulated with local school district career and technical 9 education programs. 10 b. If an existing private educational institution or an 11 existing vocational institution offering a career and technical 12 education program within the merged area has facilities and 13 curriculum of adequate size and quality which would duplicate 14 the functions of the area school, the board of directors shall 15 discuss with the institution the possibility of entering into 16 contracts to have the existing institution offer facilities 17 and curriculum to students of the merged area. The board of 18 directors shall consider any proposals submitted by the private 19 institution for providing such facilities and curriculum. The 20 board of directors may enter into such contracts. In approving 21 curriculum, the director shall ascertain that all courses 22 and programs submitted for approval are needed and that the 23 curriculum being offered by an area school does not duplicate 24 programs provided by existing public or private facilities in 25 the area. In determining whether duplication would actually 26 exist, the director shall consider the needs of the area 27 and consider whether the proposed programs are competitive 28 as to size, quality, tuition, purposes, and area coverage 29 with existing public and private educational or vocational 30 institutions within the merged area. If the board of directors 31 of the merged area chooses not to enter into contracts with 32 private institutions under this subsection , the board shall 33 submit a list of reasons why contracts to avoid duplication 34 were not entered into and an economic impact statement relating 35 -1- LSB 2325YC (4) 91 je/jh 1/ 2 H.F. _____ to the boardâs decision. 1 c. Notwithstanding paragraph âbâ , an area school shall 2 not offer, and the director shall not approve, any curriculum 3 in barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences, as defined 4 in section 157.1, if a postsecondary educational institution 5 licensed by the state of Iowa under chapter 157 to operate as 6 a school of barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences is 7 operating in the merged area on the effective date of this Act, 8 so long as the institution continues to operate in the merged 9 area. 10 Sec. 2. CURRENT STUDENTS ââ PROGRAMS CONTINUED. If a 11 community college would otherwise be required to discontinue 12 a program under the provisions of this Act, the community 13 college shall continue the program until all students enrolled 14 in the program on or before the effective date of this Act have 15 completed or left the program. 16